District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.01

Commission authorizations.

(a)

The Commission is authorized to issue financing orders upon application by the electric company. All financing orders, among their other provisions, shall:

(1)

Specify the maximum amount of Bonds that are authorized for issuance, the amount not to exceed the limitations set forth in this chapter, including the maturities, scheduled maturities, or interest rates, or interest rate determination methods and other details of the Bonds as the Commission determines appropriate;

(2)

Describe the DDOT Underground Electric Infrastructure Improvement Activities to be paid through the issuance of the Bonds and recovered through DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges;

(3)

Specify the qualitative or quantitative limitations on financing costs to be recovered (not to impair the ability to pay and service the Bonds in accordance with their terms);

(4)

Assess DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges among the distribution service customer classes of the electric company in accordance with the distribution service customer class cost allocations approved by the Commission for the electric company and in effect pursuant to the most recent base rate case; provided, that no such charges shall be assessed against the electric company’s residential aid discount customer class or any succeeding customer class approved by the Commission for the purpose of providing economic relief to a specified low-income customer class. DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges shall be billed to customers by the electric company as a volumetric surcharge;

(5)

Describe the true-up mechanism to reconcile actual collections of DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges with forecasted collection on at least an annual basis to ensure that the collections of DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges are adequate to pay debt service on the associated Bonds when due pursuant to the expected amortization schedule, to fund all debt service reserve accounts to the required levels, and to pay when due all other expected ongoing financing costs as provided in § 34-1313.14;

(6)

Authorize the creation of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Property;

(7)

Authorize the imposition, billing, and collection of DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges to pay debt service on the Bonds and other ongoing financing costs;

(8)

Describe the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Property that will be created and that may be used to pay and secure the payment of the debt service of the Bonds and other ongoing financing costs;

(9)

Authorize the execution and delivery of one or more servicing or collection agreements with the applicant electric company, including, without limitation, provisions for fixing the servicing fee, arrangements for an alternate servicer of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges, requiring the electric company to collect and remit the resulting DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges in its entirety to the trustee, as provided in § 34-1312.01, and requiring that any successor to the electric company, whether pursuant to any reorganization, bankruptcy, or other insolvency proceeding, any merger or acquisition, sale or other business combination, or transfer by operation of law, as a result of utility restructuring or otherwise, shall perform and satisfy all obligations of the electric company under the servicing agreement and the pertinent financing order in the same manner and to the same extent as the electric company, including collecting and paying to the person entitled to receive the revenues, collections, payments, or proceeds of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges;

(10)

Prescribe the filing of billing and collection reports relating to the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges; and

(11)

Consistent with this chapter, contain such other findings, determinations, and authorizations as the Commission shall consider appropriate.

(b)

All financing orders shall be operative and in full force and effect from the time fixed for them to become effective by the Commission.

(c)

The financing order shall provide that except to implement any true-up mechanism as provided is § 34-1313.14, the Commission may not amend, modify, or terminate the financing order by any subsequent action or reduce, impair, postpone, terminate, or otherwise adjust the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges approved in the financing order.

History

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 301, 61 DCR 1882

Cross References

As to the applicability of the charges authorized by §§ 34-1313.01 and § 34-1313.10, see § 34-1315.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1313.14.